California statutes. Education Code
(a) A family allowance is payable upon the death of an active member or a disabled member who was receiving a disability allowance that began to accrue after June 30, 1972.

(b) (1) For the family allowance to be payable upon the death of the member, all of the following conditions shall be met at the time of death:

(A) Death occurred after June 30, 1972.

(B) A preretirement election of an option is not in effect.

(C) The provisions for the death
 payment under this part have been met.

(2) In addition to the conditions specified in paragraph (1), at least one-half year of credited service had been performed subsequent to the end of the last break, if a break in service of more than one year had occurred.

(3) In addition to the conditions specified in paragraph (1), at least one year of credited service had been performed subsequent to the last reinstatement date, if reinstated from service or disability retirement.

(c) The family allowance shall be paid in lieu of the return of the member’s accumulated retirement contributions.

(d) The family allowance may be terminated, if all eligible beneficiaries
 formally waive their rights in accordance with the requirements established by the system. The waiver shall be submitted on a properly executed form prescribed by the system. All waiver forms for an ongoing benefit shall include an acknowledgment on the part of the waiving beneficiary that the benefit being waived is an ongoing benefit, which may exceed the total amount of contributions and interest payable from the member’s account as a result of the waiver. The filing of a waiver by a beneficiary constitutes a complete and immediate discharge of all obligations of the board, the system, or the plan to or on behalf of the beneficiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 6.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

23805.

A family allowance is payable in the amount and to the specified persons in the following order of priority:

(a) To the deceased member’s surviving spouse who has financial responsibility for at least one dependent child, an amount equal to 40 percent of the member’s final compensation or the disabled member’s projected final compensation plus 10 percent of the member’s final compensation or the disabled member’s projected final compensation for each child, up to a maximum allowance of 90 percent.

(b) If there is no surviving spouse or upon the death of the surviving spouse, to each dependent child, an amount equal to 10 percent of the deceased member’s final compensation or the disabled member’s projected final compensation, up to a maximum allowance of 50 percent. If there are more than five dependent children, they shall share equally in the maximum allowance of 50 percent.

(c) To the surviving spouse at 60 years of age or over if there is no dependent child, a monthly allowance equal to the amount that would have been payable to the spouse as beneficiary under Option 3 pursuant to Section 24300, as that section read on December 31, 2006, that provides an allowance equal to one-half of the modified retirement allowance the member would have received at 60 years of age, computed on the member’s projected final compensation and projected service to normal retirement age. The allowance payable under this subdivision shall be increased by application of the benefit improvement factor for time that elapses between the date the member would have attained normal retirement age and the date the family allowance under this subdivision begins to accrue. The allowance calculation shall include service credit for the unused sick leave that had accrued to the member as of the date of his or her death. Eligibility for the inclusion of service credit for unused sick leave credit and the calculation of that service credit shall be determined pursuant to Section 22717.

(d) If there is no surviving spouse or dependent child, to the dependent parent, 60 years of age or over, a monthly allowance equal to the amount that would have been payable to the dependent parent as beneficiary under Option 3 pursuant to Section 24300, as that section read on December 31, 2006, that provides an allowance equal to one-half of the modified retirement allowance the member would have received at 60 years of age, computed on the member’s projected final compensation and projected service to normal retirement age. The allowance calculation shall include service credit for the unused sick leave that had accrued to the member as of the date of his or her death. Eligibility for the inclusion of service credit for unused sick leave and the calculation of that service credit shall be determined pursuant to Section 22717. If there are two dependent parents, only one family allowance shall be payable under this subdivision and that allowance shall be computed on the assumption that the younger parent is the option beneficiary and the allowance shall be divided equally for as long as there are two dependent parents. Thereafter, the full allowance shall be payable to the surviving dependent parent.

(e) The surviving spouse or dependent parent may elect to begin receiving the family allowance payable under subdivision (c) or (d) immediately upon the later of the death of the member or when there is no dependent child, or to defer receipt of the allowance to the date the surviving spouse or dependent parent attains 60 years of age. If allowance payments commence prior to the date the surviving spouse or dependent parent attains 60 years of age, the allowance payable shall be actuarially reduced.

(f) If there is no dependent child, a surviving spouse or dependent parent or parents may elect, prior to receipt of the first payment under subdivision (c) or (d), to receive the member’s accumulated retirement contributions in a lump sum subject to a reduction for any disability allowance or family allowance payments previously made.

(g) (1) The allowance calculated under this section shall not include either of the following:

(A) The increase in the percentage of final compensation pursuant to Section 24203.5.

(B) The increase in the monthly allowance pursuant to Section 24203.6.

(2) This subdivision does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 323, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

23805.5.

(a) A parent claiming a benefit under Section 23805 is dependent if all of the following apply:

(1) The parent was receiving one-half or more of his or her support from the member for the tax year preceding the member’s death.

(2) The parent was declared as a dependent on the income tax return of the member for at least one of the two tax years preceding the member’s death.

(3) No one else has assumed at least one-half of the parent’s support in the tax year of the member’s death.

(4) The parent has net assets of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), excluding his or her personal residence and personal property therein.

(b) A person claiming a benefit under Section 23805 or his or her guardian shall furnish the board a state or federal income tax return and any other evidence regarding his or her financial status as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

23806.

(a) A dependent child who is not in the care of the surviving spouse shall be included in the calculation of the family allowance. That child’s portion of the allowance shall be paid to the guardian of the estate of the child, the natural or adoptive parent having custody of the child, or if none, then to the trustee of the trust established for the benefit of the child.

(b) In the case of a dependent child age 18 years or older, the child’s portion of the allowance shall be paid to the guardian of the estate of the child, trustee of the trust established for the benefit of the child, or if none, then to the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1165, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

23809.

The family allowance payable to the surviving spouse who has financial responsibility for at least one dependent child, or the family allowance payable to a dependent child, shall be reduced by an amount equal to the unmodified benefits paid or payable from other public systems for the same event which qualified the surviving spouse or dependent child for the family allowance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1165, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

23810.

If the person or persons to whom a family allowance is payable dies or no longer qualifies for the allowance, the allowance shall be terminated on the day of that event except as provided in Section 24600.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

23811.

(a) Upon termination of family allowances under this part and prior to the payment of allowances equal to the amount of the member’s accumulated retirement contributions at the time of death, the balance shall be paid to the member’s beneficiary.

(b) Payments provided under this section shall include credited interest on the unpaid balance calculated from the date family allowances were last paid or from the date of death, if no family allowance payments were made, to the date the balance is paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

23812.

(a) The surviving spouse of a deceased member who previously lost entitlement to benefits prescribed by this part due to remarriage shall be entitled to resume payment of the benefits effective either on January 1, 2000, or the first day of the month following receipt by the board of a written application for resumption of benefits, whichever date is later. The amount of the benefits payable shall be calculated as though the benefits had been paid without interruption from the date of remarriage through the benefits resumption effective date.

(b) The board shall be under no requirement to identify, locate, or notify a remarried spouse of a deceased member who previously lost entitlement as a result of remarriage about the resumption of benefits provided in this section. The board shall be under no requirement to provide the name or address or any other information concerning any remarried spouse of a deceased member to any person, agency, or entity for the purpose of notifying those who may be eligible for the resumption of benefits under this section.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to imply or interpreted to mean that the benefits addressed shall be required to be paid retroactively.

(d) This section does not apply to the surviving domestic partner of a member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 912, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 23. Active Death Benefits: Survivor Benefits [23850. - 23859.]

23850.

This chapter governs the eligibility provisions, benefit provisions, allowance computations, and related provisions for the benefits payable under this part with respect to the Defined Benefit Program upon the death of eligible members. “Member,” as used in this chapter, means all persons who become members of the plan under this part on or after October 16, 1992, and all persons who were members as of October 15, 1992, who elected, pursuant to Chapter 21.5 (commencing with Section 23700), to be covered under the death benefit provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1025, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23851.

(a) A death payment of not less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) shall be paid to the beneficiary, as designated pursuant to Section 23300, upon receipt of proof of death of a member, who had one or more years of credited service, including service deemed to the member under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 22851, at least one of which had been earned subsequent to the most recent refund of accumulated retirement contributions, if the member died during any one of the following periods:

(1) While in employment for which creditable compensation is paid.

(2) Within four months after
 termination of creditable service or termination of employment, whichever occurs first.

(3) Within 12 months of the last day for which creditable compensation was paid, if the member was on an approved leave of absence without creditable compensation for reasons other than disability.

(4) While on a leave of absence to perform qualified military service, if the death occurred on or after January 1, 2007.

(b) A death payment pursuant to this section shall not be payable for the death of a member that occurs within one year commencing with the effective date of termination of the service retirement allowance pursuant to Section 24208 or during the six calendar months commencing with the effective date of termination of the disability
 retirement allowance pursuant to Section 24117.

(c) The board may adjust the death payment amount following each actuarial valuation based on changes in the All Urban California Consumer Price Index and adopt as a plan amendment with respect to the Defined Benefit Program any adjusted amount.

(d) A designated beneficiary may waive the right to the death payment in accordance with the requirements established by the system. The waiver shall be submitted on a properly executed form prescribed by the system. The filing of a waiver by a beneficiary constitutes a complete and immediate discharge of all obligations of the board, the system, or the plan to or on behalf of the beneficiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 7.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

23852.

Upon receipt of proof of death of a member who has no preretirement option in effect:

(a) The surviving spouse may elect to receive either of the following:

(1) The member’s accumulated retirement contributions in a lump sum.

(2) If the member meets the provisions set forth in Section 23854, the survivor benefit allowance pursuant to Sections 23854 and 23855.

(b) If there is no surviving spouse, and the member meets the provisions set forth in Section 23854, then each dependent child shall receive the child’s
 portion of the survivor benefit allowance pursuant to Sections 23854, 23855, and 23856. The child’s portion of the survivor benefit allowance shall be paid in lieu of the return of the member’s accumulated retirement contributions.

(c) If there is no surviving spouse or dependent child to receive a benefit under subdivision (a) or (b), the member’s accumulated retirement contributions shall be paid to the member’s beneficiary in a lump sum.

(d) The member’s accumulated annuity deposit contributions shall be paid to the member’s beneficiary in a lump sum.

(e) The payment of accumulated contributions in a lump sum shall include credited interest through the date of payment.

(f) A beneficiary may waive the right to the lump-sum payment or survivor benefit allowance in accordance with the requirements established by the system. The waiver shall be submitted on a properly executed form prescribed by the system. All waiver forms for an ongoing benefit shall include an acknowledgment on the part of the waiving beneficiary that the benefit being waived is an ongoing benefit, which may exceed the total amount of contributions and interest payable from the member’s account as a result of the waiver. The filing of a waiver by a beneficiary constitutes a complete and immediate discharge of all obligations of the board, the system, or the plan to, or on behalf of, the beneficiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 13.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23853.

Notwithstanding Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13100) of Part 1 of Division 8 of the Probate Code or any other provision of law to the contrary, death payments and return of contributions pursuant to Sections 23851 and 23852, if any, may be requested by the surviving spouse or beneficiary and paid by the system as soon as practicable after receipt of proof of death.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

23854.

(a) A survivor benefit allowance is payable upon receipt of proof of death of a member, as defined in Section 23850, who had one or more years of credited service, including deemed service under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 22851, at least one of which had been earned subsequent to the most recent refund of accumulated retirement contributions.

(b) For the survivor benefit allowance to be payable upon the death of a member, all of the following conditions shall be met at the time of death:

(1) Death occurred after October 15, 1992.

(2) A preretirement election of an option is not in effect.

(3) Death occurs during any one of the following periods:

(A) While in employment for which compensation is paid.

(B) Within four months after termination of service or termination of employment, whichever occurs first.

(C) Within four months after reinstatement from disability retirement.

(D) Within 12 months following the last day for which compensation was paid if the member was on an approved leave of absence without compensation for reasons other than disability.

(E) While on a leave of absence to perform qualified military service, if the death occurred on or after January 1, 2007.

(4) At least one-half year of credited service had been performed subsequent to the end of the last break in service, if a break in service of more than one year had occurred.

(5) At least one year of credited service had been performed subsequent to the last reinstatement date, if reinstated from service retirement.

(c) The survivor benefit allowance shall be paid in lieu of the return of the member’s accumulated retirement contributions.

(d) The survivor benefit allowance may be terminated, if all eligible beneficiaries formally
 waive their rights in accordance with the requirements established by the system. The waiver shall be submitted on a properly executed form prescribed by the system. All waiver forms for an ongoing benefit shall include an acknowledgment on the part of the waiving beneficiary that the benefit being waived is an ongoing benefit, which may exceed the total amount of contributions and interest payable from the member’s account as a result of the waiver. The filing of a waiver by a beneficiary constitutes a complete and immediate discharge of all obligations of the board, the system, or the plan to or on behalf of the beneficiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 8.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

23855.

(a) The survivor benefit allowance is a monthly allowance equal to one-half of the modified retirement allowance the member would have received at normal retirement age, if the member had retired and elected Option 3 pursuant to Section 24300, as that section read on December 31, 2006, naming the spouse as the option beneficiary.

(b) The allowance payable under this subdivision shall be based on the member’s actual service credit and final compensation as of the date of his or her death, the retirement factor at normal retirement age, and the member’s and spouse’s ages as of the date the member would have attained normal retirement age. If the member’s death occurs after he or she
 attains normal retirement age, his or her actual final compensation, the retirement factor at normal retirement age, and the member’s and spouse’s ages as of the date of the member’s death shall be used in the allowance calculation.

(c) The allowance calculation shall include service credit for the unused sick leave that had accrued to the member as of the date of his or her death. Eligibility for the inclusion of unused sick leave service credit and the calculation of that service credit shall be determined pursuant to Section 22717.

(d) (1) The allowance calculation shall not include either of the following:

(A) The increase in the percentage of final compensation pursuant to Section 24203.5.

(B) The increase of the monthly
 allowance pursuant to Section 24203.6.

(2) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this paragraph do not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of, existing law.

(e) The surviving spouse may elect to begin receiving the survivor benefit allowance immediately as of the date of the member’s death or to defer receipt of the allowance to the date the member would have attained normal retirement age. If allowance payments to the surviving spouse commence prior to the date the member would have attained normal retirement age, the allowance payable shall be actuarially reduced.

(f) If the spouse elects, pursuant to Section 23852, to receive the survivor benefit allowance, an additional 10 percent of final compensation shall be payable for each dependent child who is under 21 years of age, up to a maximum
 of 50 percent of final compensation. The child’s portion shall begin to accrue on the day following the member’s date of death and shall be payable even if the spouse elects to postpone receipt of the spouse’s survivor benefit allowance until the date the member would have attained normal retirement age.

(g) If there is no surviving spouse, an allowance in an amount equal to 10 percent of the deceased member’s final compensation shall be paid to each dependent child who is under 21 years of age, up to a maximum of 50 percent of final compensation. If there are more than five dependent children, they shall receive allowances in equal shares of the 50 percent of final compensation. A child’s portion of the survivor benefit allowance shall begin to accrue on the day following the member’s date of death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 18.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

23856.

(a) A dependent child who is not in the care of the surviving spouse shall be included in the calculation of the children’s portion of the survivor benefit allowance. That child’s portion of the allowance shall be paid to the guardian of the estate of the child, the natural or adoptive parent having custody of the child, or if none, then to the trustee of the trust established for the benefit of the child.

(b) In the case of a dependent child who is age 18 years or older, the child’s portion of the allowance shall be paid to the guardian of the estate of the child, trustee of the trust established for the benefit of the child, or if none, then to the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1165, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

23858.

If the person or persons to whom a survivor benefit allowance is payable dies or no longer qualifies for the allowance, the allowance shall be terminated on the day of the event except as provided in Section 24600.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

23859.

(a) Upon termination of a survivor benefit allowance pursuant to this chapter, if the total allowance paid or payable is less than the amount of the member’s accumulated retirement contributions at the time of death, the remaining balance of accumulated retirement contributions shall be paid to the estate of the spouse.

(b) If there is no spouse, and if there is a designated beneficiary pursuant to Section 23300, then upon termination of the survivor benefit allowance payable to all eligible dependent children pursuant to Section 23852, if the total allowance paid or payable is less than the amount of the member’s accumulated retirement contributions at the time of death, the remaining balance of the accumulated retirement
 contributions shall be paid to the member’s designated beneficiary pursuant to Section 23300.

(c) Payments provided under this section shall include credited interest on the unpaid balance calculated from the date the last survivor benefit allowance payment was made or from the date of death of the member, if no survivor benefit allowance payments were made, to the date the balance is paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 304, Sec. 17.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 24. Retired Death Benefits [23880. - 23882.]

23880.

(a) A death payment of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be paid to the beneficiary, as designated pursuant to Section 23300, upon receipt of proof of death of either of the following:

(1) A retired member.

(2) A member, if the death payment pursuant to Section 23801 would have otherwise been payable or if the conditions specified pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 23854 are met, and if the member’s death occurs during one of the following periods:

(A) Within one year commencing
 with the effective date of reinstatement from service retirement pursuant to Section 24208.

(B) Within six months commencing with the effective date of reinstatement from disability retirement pursuant to Section 24117.

(b) The board may adjust the death payment amount following each actuarial valuation based on changes in the All Urban California Consumer Price Index and adopt as a plan amendment any adjusted amount.

(c) A designated beneficiary may waive the right to the death payment in accordance with the requirements established by the system. The waiver shall be submitted on a properly executed form prescribed by the system. The filing of a waiver by a beneficiary constitutes a complete and immediate discharge of all
 obligations of the board, the system, or the plan to or on behalf of the
 beneficiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 9.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

23881.

(a) If upon receipt of proof of death of a retired member who was receiving an unmodified allowance and who retired under this part after June 30, 1972, there is a remaining balance of the member’s accumulated retirement contributions, the balance shall be paid to the member’s beneficiary.

(b) Upon receipt of proof of death of a retired member’s option beneficiary after the beneficiary begins to receive an allowance, the remaining balance of a member’s accumulated retirement contributions, if any, shall be paid to the beneficiary designated by the option beneficiary to receive that payment.

(c) The remaining balance of a retired member’s accumulated retirement contributions shall be the difference between the balance of the accumulated retirement contributions on the effective date of the member’s retirement and the total retirement allowance paid or payable to the retired member on the date of the member’s death. If the retired member predeceased the option beneficiary, the remaining balance of the retired member’s accumulated retirement contributions shall be the difference between the balance of the accumulated retirement contributions on the effective date of the member’s retirement and the total retirement allowance paid or payable to the retired member and the option beneficiary on the date of the option beneficiary’s death.

(d) Payments pursuant to this section shall include interest on the remaining balance of
 accumulated retirement contributions calculated from the date the last allowance payment was made to the date the remaining balance of accumulated retirement contributions is paid.

(e) A designated beneficiary may waive the right to the death payment in accordance with the requirements established by the system. The waiver shall be submitted on a properly executed form prescribed by the system. The filing of a waiver by a beneficiary constitutes a complete and immediate discharge of all obligations of the board, the system, or the plan to or on behalf of the beneficiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 10.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

23882.

Notwithstanding Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13100) of Part 1 of Division 8 of the Probate Code or any other provision of law, death payments and return of contributions pursuant to Sections 23880 and 23881, if any, may be requested by the beneficiary and paid by the system as soon as practicable after receipt of proof of death.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 25. Disability Allowance [24001. - 24018.]

24001.

A member may apply for a disability allowance under the Defined Benefit Program upon written application for disability allowance to the board on a properly executed form provided by the system and subject to the following:

(a) (1) The member has five or more years of credited service and all of the following requirements are met:

(A) At least four years were credited for actual performance of service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program. Credit received because of workers’ compensation payments shall be counted toward the four-year requirement in accordance with Section 22710.

(B) The last five years of credited service were performed in this state.

(C) Except as described in subdivision (d) of Section 24201.5, the member is not currently receiving a service retirement allowance and at least one year was credited for service performed subsequent to the date on which the member terminated a service retirement allowance under Section 24208.

(D) At least one year was credited for service performed subsequent to the most recent refund of accumulated retirement contributions.

(E) The member has neither attained normal retirement age, nor possesses sufficient unused sick leave days to receive creditable compensation on account of
 sick leave to normal retirement age.

(F) The member is not applying for a disability allowance because of a physical or mental condition known to exist at the time the most recent membership in the Defined Benefit Program commenced and remains substantially unchanged at the time of application.

(2) A member who becomes disabled prior to normal retirement age, who has sick leave which will extend beyond normal retirement age, and who has a dependent child, may be awarded a disability allowance with an effective date after normal retirement age if the application is filed prior to attaining normal retirement age.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) shall affect the right of a member to a disability allowance under
 this part if the reason that the member is credited with less than four years of actual service performed subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program is due to an on-the-job injury or a disease that occurred while the member was employed and the four-year requirement can be satisfied by credit obtained under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 22800) or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 22850) in addition to any credit received from workers’ compensation
 payments.

(c) Nothing in subdivision (a) shall affect the right of a member under this part who has less than five years of credited service to a disability allowance if the following conditions are met:

(1) The member has at least one year of credited service performed in this state.

(2) The disability is the direct result of an unlawful act of bodily injury that was perpetrated on his or her person by another human being while the member was performing his or her official duties in a position subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program.

(3) The member provides documentation of the unlawful act in the form of an official police
 report or official employer incident report.

(d) A member who is eligible to apply for a disability allowance pursuant to this section may also apply for a service retirement pending a determination of his or her application for disability as described in Section 24201.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 14.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24001.5.

A member shall not be eligible for a disability allowance under the Defined Benefit Program while on a leave of absence to serve as a full-time elected officer of an employee organization, even if the member receives service credit under Section 22711.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 803, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

24002.

(a) The board may authorize payment of a disability allowance to any member who is qualified upon application under this part by the member, the member’s guardian or conservator, or the member’s employer, if the application is submitted on a properly executed form prescribed by the system during any one of the following periods:

(1) While the member is employed and has performed creditable service within the four months previous to application, or while the member is on a compensated leave of absence.

(2) While the member is physically or mentally incapacitated for performance of service and the incapacity has been continuous from the last day of actual
 performance of service for which compensation is payable to the member.

(3) While the member is on a leave of absence without compensation, granted for reason other than mental or physical incapacity for performance of service, and within four months after the last day of actual performance of service for which compensation is payable to the member, or within 12 months of that date if the member is on an employer-approved leave to study at an approved college or university.

(4) Within four months after the termination of the member’s employment subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program, if the application was not made under paragraph (2) and was not made more than four months after the last day of actual performance of service for which compensation is payable to the member.

(b) A member is not qualified
 to receive a disability allowance if the member is applying because of a physical or mental condition that existed at the time the most recent membership in the Defined Benefit Program commenced and which remains substantially unchanged at the time of application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 19.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

24003.

(a) The member shall provide medical documentation to substantiate the impairment qualifying the member for the disability allowance.

(b) On receipt of an application for disability allowance under this part, the system may order a medical examination or review of medical documentation of a member to determine whether the member is incapacitated for performance of service. The medical examination or review of medical documentation shall be conducted by a practicing physician, selected by the board, with expertise in the member’s impairment and the board shall pay all costs associated with the examination or review of medical documentation. If the member refuses to submit to the required medical examination or review of medical documentation, the application for
 disability allowance shall be rejected. If a medical examination is ordered:

(1) The member shall either remain in this state, or return to this state at the member’s own expense, to undergo the medical examination, or the application shall be rejected, unless this requirement is waived by the board. The board shall pay all other reasonable costs related to travel and meals in accordance with the rates set for state employees by the Department of Human Resources.

(2) If the member is too ill to be examined, the system shall postpone the examination until the member can be examined. The member or the member’s treating physician shall inform the system, in writing, when the medical examination can be rescheduled.

(c) The system may reject the disability allowance application under this part if the member fails to
 provide requested medical documentation to substantiate a disability, as defined in Section 22126, within 45 days from the date of the request or within 30 days from the time that a legally designated representative is empowered to act on behalf of a member who is mentally or physically incapacitated.

(d) If the board determines that a member who has applied for a disability allowance under this part may perform service in the member’s former position of employment or in a comparable level position with the assistance of reasonable accommodation, the board may require the member to request reasonable accommodation from the employer. Failure of the member to request reasonable accommodation, as directed by the board, may be grounds for cancellation of the disability allowance application.

(e) If the employer fails or refuses to provide reasonable accommodation, the board may
 require the member to pursue an administrative appeal of the employer’s denial as a condition for receiving a disability allowance under this part.

(f) The system shall inform the member of the rejection or cancellation of the member’s disability allowance application under this part within 30 days after that determination is made by the system.

(g) In determining whether a member meets the definition of disability pursuant to Section 22126, the board shall make a determination on the basis of competent medical documentation and shall not use the awarding of a disability allowance as a substitute for the disciplinary process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 8.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

24004.

In cases of a member’s willful substance abuse or if the board determines a member who qualifies for a disability allowance pursuant to Section 24001 has mental, physical, or vocational rehabilitation potential, the board may limit the disability allowance under this part to a period not to exceed two years from the date of approval of the disability allowance. Notwithstanding Section 24013, the disability allowance shall terminate at the end of the period granted unless an extension is granted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 149.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24005.

(a) A disability allowance under this part shall become effective upon any date designated by the member, provided all of the following conditions are met:

(1) An application for disability allowance is filed on a properly executed form prescribed by the system.

(2) The effective date is later than the last day the member earned creditable compensation pursuant to Section 22119.2 or 22119.3.

(3) The effective date is no earlier than either the first day of the month in which the application is received by the system’s headquarters office or the date upon and continuously after which the member is
 determined to the satisfaction of the board to have been mentally incompetent.
